FST/guessLexc.lexc
LEXICON NounGuess
        a		NounGuess;
	b		NounGuess;
	c		NounGuess;
	d		NounGuess;
	e		NounGuess;
	f		NounGuess;
	g		NounGuess;
	h		NounGuess;
	i		NounGuess;
	j		NounGuess;
	k		NounGuess;
	l		NounGuess;
	m		NounGuess;
	n		NounGuess;
	o		NounGuess;
	p		NounGuess;
	q		NounGuess;
	r		NounGuess;
	s		NounGuess;
	t		NounGuess;
	u		NounGuess;
	v		NounGuess;
	w		NounGuess;
	x		NounGuess;
	y		NounGuess;
	z		NounGuess;
	NounSuffix;


LEXICON	NounSuffix
	+YOUNG.OF:%^ana		#;
	+MALE.OF:%^gabo		#;
	+FEMALE.OF:%^gore		#;
	+FEMALE.OF:%^kazi		#;
	+MALE.OF:%^rume		#;
	0:0			#;

LEXICON ProperNounHelper
	+:0		ProperNoun;
	+GUESS+:0		ProperNounGuess;


LEXICON ProperNounGuess
        a		ProperNounGuess;
	b		ProperNounGuess;
	c		ProperNounGuess;
	d		ProperNounGuess;
	e		ProperNounGuess;
	f		ProperNounGuess;
	g		ProperNounGuess;
	h		ProperNounGuess;
	i		ProperNounGuess;
	j		ProperNounGuess;
	k		ProperNounGuess;
	l		ProperNounGuess;
	m		ProperNounGuess;
	n		ProperNounGuess;
	o		ProperNounGuess;
	p		ProperNounGuess;
	q		ProperNounGuess;
	r		ProperNounGuess;
	s		ProperNounGuess;
	t		ProperNounGuess;
	u		ProperNounGuess;
	v		ProperNounGuess;
	w		ProperNounGuess;
	x		ProperNounGuess;
	y		ProperNounGuess;
	z		ProperNounGuess;
	#;

LEXICON NounRoot
	wanyu		NounSuffix;
	abusorosiyo		NounSuffix;
	aderesi		NounSuffix;
	aga		NounSuffix;
	aguke		NounSuffix;
	aka		NounSuffix;
	ambaro		NounSuffix;
	ambi		NounSuffix;
	ambuzi		NounSuffix;
	amu		NounSuffix;
	andikire		NounSuffix;
	anditsi		NounSuffix;
	ango		NounSuffix;
	ansi		NounSuffix;
	anya		NounSuffix;
	anzi		NounSuffix;
	ara		NounSuffix;
	aro		NounSuffix;
	ashyinguwe		NounSuffix;
	asuranse		NounSuffix;
	kibisi		NounSuffix;
	baba		NounSuffix;
	babi		NounSuffix;
	bago		NounSuffix;
	bamba		NounSuffix;
	bando		NounSuffix;
	banza		NounSuffix;
	baraga		NounSuffix;
	baraza		NounSuffix;
	kabiri		NounSuffix;
	bata		NounSuffix;
	batizo		NounSuffix;
	bazo		NounSuffix;
	beho		NounSuffix;
	bere		NounSuffix;
	besani		NounSuffix;
	biba		NounSuffix;
	bije		NounSuffix;
	bingo		NounSuffix;
	biriti		NounSuffix;
	bisi		NounSuffix;
	bohore		NounSuffix;
	bonerahamwe		NounSuffix;
	bonobono		NounSuffix;
	boza		NounSuffix;
	cy'indege		NounSuffix;
	bumba		NounSuffix;
	bundo		NounSuffix;
	burira		NounSuffix;
	buye		NounSuffix;
	bwiriza		NounSuffix;
	byaro		NounSuffix;
	byibuhe		NounSuffix;
	byiro		NounSuffix;
	cakubiri		NounSuffix;
	candwe		NounSuffix;
	capwe		NounSuffix;
	cenga		NounSuffix;
	cinya		NounSuffix;
	cuba		NounSuffix;
	cukuzi		NounSuffix;
	cumuro		NounSuffix;
	cungu		NounSuffix;
	curane		NounSuffix;
	curuzwa		NounSuffix;
	daca		NounSuffix;
	dahano		NounSuffix;
	dakemwa		NounSuffix;
	dangahantu		NounSuffix;
	mu		NounSuffix;
	darubindi		NounSuffix;
	databuja		NounSuffix;
	dayimoni		NounSuffix;
	degede		NounSuffix;
	denariyo		NounSuffix;
	depite		NounSuffix;
	dimu		NounSuffix;
	dirimbo		NounSuffix;
	diyabete		NounSuffix;
	dobo		NounSuffix;
	dogobe		NounSuffix;
	dosiye		NounSuffix;
	duka		NounSuffix;
	dushe		NounSuffix;
	dyanishamurizo		NounSuffix;
	ego		NounSuffix;
	ene		NounSuffix;
	epatite		NounSuffix;
	erirezi		NounSuffix;
	esanse		NounSuffix;
	ezi		NounSuffix;
	fana		NounSuffix;
	darayivi		NounSuffix;
	fasha		NounSuffix;
	fatanye		NounSuffix;
	feza		NounSuffix;
	firigo		NounSuffix;
	forode		NounSuffix;
	fu		NounSuffix;
	fungo		NounSuffix;
	funi		NounSuffix;
	furu		NounSuffix;
	w'isi		NounSuffix;
	gahunda		NounSuffix;
	gambi		NounSuffix;
	gananani		NounSuffix;
	ganatanu		NounSuffix;
	gando		NounSuffix;
	gano		NounSuffix;
	garagarire		NounSuffix;
	garama		NounSuffix;
	gariyamoshi		NounSuffix;
	gashyantare		NounSuffix;
	gatigisimu		NounSuffix;
	gemu		NounSuffix;
	geni		NounSuffix;
	geragezo		NounSuffix;
	gerwaho		NounSuffix;
	gi		NounSuffix;
	gingo		NounSuffix;
	gishwanama		NounSuffix;
	cy'amashuri		NounSuffix;
	gofero		NounSuffix;
	gombajwi		NounSuffix;
	gomo		NounSuffix;
	goramye		NounSuffix;
	gori		NounSuffix;
	gororano		NounSuffix;
	gozi		NounSuffix;
	guma		NounSuffix;
	guri		NounSuffix;
	gurube		NounSuffix;
	guzanyo		NounSuffix;
	gwaneza		NounSuffix;
	hagarike		NounSuffix;
	haho		NounSuffix;
	gihamya		NounSuffix;
	hande		NounSuffix;
	hango		NounSuffix;
	hanuzi		NounSuffix;
	haruro		NounSuffix;
	haza		NounSuffix;
	y'amaraso		NounSuffix;
	hemberwe		NounSuffix;
	hengeri		NounSuffix;
	heta		NounSuffix;
	hinde		NounSuffix;
	hisi		NounSuffix;
	w'igi		NounSuffix;
	hugu		NounSuffix;
	huna		NounSuffix;
	hurunguru		NounSuffix;
	ibo		NounSuffix;
	ifatire		NounSuffix;
	igimbakirwa		NounSuffix;
	ijiji		NounSuffix;
	injira		NounSuffix;
	irabura		NounSuffix;
	irungu		NounSuffix;
	itso		NounSuffix;
	iza		NounSuffix;
	jagari		NounSuffix;
	jeri		NounSuffix;
	jokeri		NounSuffix;
	juru		NounSuffix;
	jyi		NounSuffix;
	kamba		NounSuffix;
	kanaka		NounSuffix;
	kangurambaga		NounSuffix;
	kara		NounSuffix;
	kariso		NounSuffix;
	kato		NounSuffix;
	keka		NounSuffix;
	kenyero		NounSuffix;
	kiko		NounSuffix;
	kinnyi		NounSuffix;
	kirigitwa		NounSuffix;
	kohwa		NounSuffix;
	komisiyo		NounSuffix;
	konji		NounSuffix;
	koranabuhanga		NounSuffix;
	koresha		NounSuffix;
	korwa		NounSuffix;
	kristo		NounSuffix;
	kumi		NounSuffix;
	kunzi		NounSuffix;
	kwano		NounSuffix;
	kwiriye		NounSuffix;
	lometero		NounSuffix;
	mambo		NounSuffix;
	masa		NounSuffix;
	me		NounSuffix;
	mesa		NounSuffix;
	misiyo		NounSuffix;
	igendanwa		NounSuffix;
	nama		NounSuffix;
	ndikagihe		NounSuffix;
	nini		NounSuffix;
	nsi		NounSuffix;
	nyabupfura		NounSuffix;
	nyakanga		NounSuffix;
	nyamakuru		NounSuffix;
	nyamunyu		NounSuffix;
	nyanduga		NounSuffix;
	nyarukiko		NounSuffix;
	nyetorero		NounSuffix;
	nyirakuru		NounSuffix;
	nyogote		NounSuffix;
	nyoni		NounSuffix;
	nyundo		NounSuffix;
	obo		NounSuffix;
	ongereza		NounSuffix;
	ozi		NounSuffix;
	pamba		NounSuffix;
	pantufure		NounSuffix;
	paruwasi		NounSuffix;
	penaliti		NounSuffix;
	petroli		NounSuffix;
	pfundikizo		NounSuffix;
	pimo		NounSuffix;
	pitagihe		NounSuffix;
	virusi		NounSuffix;
	pumyi		NounSuffix;
	pyiko		NounSuffix;
	rago		NounSuffix;
	rande		NounSuffix;
	rari		NounSuffix;
	rava		NounSuffix;
	remere		NounSuffix;
	repubulika		NounSuffix;
	ribwa		NounSuffix;
	ringiti		NounSuffix;
	rizo		NounSuffix;
	rongo		NounSuffix;
	rorero		NounSuffix;
	rumirahabiri		NounSuffix;
	rwa		NounSuffix;
	sa		NounSuffix;
	sabune		NounSuffix;
	saka		NounSuffix;
	sambu		NounSuffix;
	sanzwe		NounSuffix;
	satsi		NounSuffix;
	seke		NounSuffix;
	senga		NounSuffix;
	sepfu		NounSuffix;
	sezerano		NounSuffix;
	shampiyona		NounSuffix;
	shema		NounSuffix;
	shinga		NounSuffix;
	shishe		NounSuffix;
	shoka		NounSuffix;
	shumi		NounSuffix;
	shuro		NounSuffix;
	shyamba		NounSuffix;
	shyi		NounSuffix;
	shyitsi		NounSuffix;
	siga		NounSuffix;
	sine		NounSuffix;
	icyerekezo		NounSuffix;
	so		NounSuffix;
	sogokuruza		NounSuffix;
	soresha		NounSuffix;
	subiramo		NounSuffix;
	sumeno		NounSuffix;
	swa		NounSuffix;
	tafari		NounSuffix;
	tambaro		NounSuffix;
	tandukana		NounSuffix;
	tango		NounSuffix;
	tare		NounSuffix;
	tavu		NounSuffix;
	tege		NounSuffix;
	teja		NounSuffix;
	tereviziyo		NounSuffix;
	tere		NounSuffix;
	teto		NounSuffix;
	timanama		NounSuffix;
	toke		NounSuffix;
	tora		NounSuffix;
	toza		NounSuffix;
	tsindamabara		NounSuffix;
	tumba		NounSuffix;
	tungo		NounSuffix;
	tusi		NounSuffix;
	twara		NounSuffix;
	ubahiro		NounSuffix;
	n'akugarizo		NounSuffix;
	umweru		NounSuffix;
	uzi		NounSuffix;
	vu		NounSuffix;
	vugwaho		NounSuffix;
	vumu		NounSuffix;
	vuriro		NounSuffix;
	yahudi		NounSuffix;
	yisilamu		NounSuffix;
	yunguruzo		NounSuffix;
	zamuko		NounSuffix;
	zima		NounSuffix;
	zinga		NounSuffix;
	zu		NounSuffix;
	rimwe		NounSuffix;
	munani		NounSuffix;
	sina		NounSuffix;
	amategeko		NounSuffix;
	nyamuryango		NounSuffix;
	tunganyirize		NounSuffix;
	vune		NounSuffix;
	dyo		NounSuffix;
	camake		NounSuffix;
	gondoro		NounSuffix;
	buzi		NounSuffix;
	tangaro		NounSuffix;
	nyunguti		NounSuffix;
	tiyo		NounSuffix;
	pinduramatwara		NounSuffix;
	songero		NounSuffix;
	y'imfunge		NounSuffix;
	y'indagi		NounSuffix;
	konda		NounSuffix;
	kanga		NounSuffix;
	aruzi		NounSuffix;
	ze		NounSuffix;
	bondo		NounSuffix;
	kubiri		NounSuffix;
	tubu		NounSuffix;
	seru		NounSuffix;
	wa		NounSuffix;
	sunzu		NounSuffix;
	iko		NounSuffix;
	songa		NounSuffix;
	tita		NounSuffix;
	iherero		NounSuffix;
	ngononwa		NounSuffix;
	tsike		NounSuffix;
	mogi		NounSuffix;
	nyemera		NounSuffix;
	ondi		NounSuffix;
	kwakuzi		NounSuffix;
	shoro		NounSuffix;
	nyamuneza		NounSuffix;
	konkobotsi		NounSuffix;
	ugu		NounSuffix;
	seritifika		NounSuffix;
	tamatama		NounSuffix;
	tumbero		NounSuffix;
	saruro		NounSuffix;
	pansiyo		NounSuffix;
	nyirarume		NounSuffix;
	rusi		NounSuffix;
	miriyoni		NounSuffix;
	shambo		NounSuffix;
	tarya		NounSuffix;
	verisiyo		NounSuffix;
	sumbi		NounSuffix;
	binga		NounSuffix;
	mitarayeze		NounSuffix;
	nyakuri		NounSuffix;
	nigi		NounSuffix;
	hurira		NounSuffix;
	bonano		NounSuffix;
	rasoro		NounSuffix;
	havu		NounSuffix;
	terabwoba		NounSuffix;
	manda		NounSuffix;
	yovu		NounSuffix;
	shakiro		NounSuffix;
	kenke		NounSuffix;
	jabiro		NounSuffix;
	vugwarimwe		NounSuffix;
	karo		NounSuffix;
	gemo		NounSuffix;
	tangawizi		NounSuffix;
	bugenewe		NounSuffix;
	ganzacyaro		NounSuffix;
	genzura		NounSuffix;
	ndangamurage		NounSuffix;
	nyomeke		NounSuffix;
	perereza		NounSuffix;
	baruramari		NounSuffix;
	pfundiko		NounSuffix;
